Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1741
Seller-assisted marketing plan; contract for sale or lease; written; copy to purchaser.

Every contract for sale or lease of a seller-assisted marketing plan in this state shall be in writing and shall be subject to the provisions of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act. A copy of the fully completed contract and all other documents the seller requires the purchaser to sign shall be given to the purchaser at the time such documents are signed.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 41;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 16.